Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [3.0555] LEGISLATIVE TECHNOLOGY AND OFFICE SPACE; USE LIMITED. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Email and telephone. new text end new text begin A member, officer, or employee of the senate or house of representatives is prohibited from establishing a legislative email address for or assigning a legislative telephone number to a person who is not a member, officer, or employee of the senate or house of representatives. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Member telephone numbers. new text end new text begin The legislative telephone number assigned by the senate or house of representatives to a member is for the exclusive use of the member and, if authorized by the member, an employee who is assigned to the member by the member's caucus or house. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Office space. new text end new text begin A member, officer, or employee of the senate or house of representatives is prohibited from allowing a contractor or other person who is not a member, officer, or employee to permanently or temporarily occupy an office in space assigned by the commissioner of administration to the senate or house of representatives without prior written notification to the leaders of each caucus in the relevant house. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin The senate and house of representatives must adopt rules to implement this section, which must include remedies. The remedies provided by rules of the senate and house of representatives are exclusive and a court or administrative agency does not have jurisdiction to (1) enforce, enjoin, penalize, award damages, or otherwise act upon a violation or alleged violation of this section, (2) invalidate any provision of law because of a violation of this section, or (3) otherwise interpret this section. new text end